Maryland, session 2025, SB0127.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
2–208.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Indirect costs” means any costs that would be considered to be indirect
costs under OMB Uniform Guidance.
(3) “Nonprofit organization” means an organization that is tax exempt
under § 501(c)(3), (4), or (6) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(4) “OMB Uniform Guidance” means the Uniform Administrative
Requirements, Cost Principles, and Audit Requirements for Federal Awards adopted by the
Office of Management and Budget in 2 C.F.R. 200 and any related guidance published by
the Office of Management and Budget.
(b) (1) This section applies only to:
(i) a grant or contract awarded on or after October 1, 2018;
(ii) a multi–year grant or contract awarded before October 1, 2018,
if:
1. the grant or contract continues to be in effect on or after
October 1, 2018; and
2. funding for the grant or contract is required to be
authorized separately for each fiscal year; and
(iii) an extension or a renewal of a grant or contract if the extension
or renewal is awarded on or after July 1, 2019.
(2) This section applies whether or not the funds awarded through the
grant or contract are transferred directly by the State or through a third party to the
nonprofit organization.
(3) This section does not require the reimbursement of indirect costs
incurred under a multi–year grant or contract described under paragraph (1)(ii) of this
subsection during any fiscal year that begins before July 1, 2019.

SENATE BILL 127 3
(c) If a nonprofit organization is a direct recipient or subrecipient of a grant or
contract for the provision of services that is funded wholly with State funds or with a
combination of State and other nonfederal funds, the terms of the grant or contract shall
allow for reimbursement of indirect costs:
(1) at the same rate the nonprofit organization has negotiated and
received:
(i) for indirect costs under a direct federal award; or
(ii) from a nonfederal entity based on the cost principles in Subpart
E of OMB Uniform Guidance; or
(2) if the nonprofit organization has not negotiated and received an indirect
cost rate described in item (1) of this subsection, at a rate [of at least 10%] EQUAL TO THE
GREATER OF THE DE MINIMIS RATE ESTABLISHED IN SUBPART E OF OMB UNIFORM
GUIDANCE OR 15% of the costs that would be considered modified total direct costs under
OMB Uniform Guidance.
2–210.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Council” means the Maryland Efficient Grant Application Council
established under § 2–209 of this subtitle.
(3) “Department” means the Department of Budget and Management.
(6) “Uniform Guidance” means the Office of Management and Budget
Uniform Administrative Requirements, Cost Principles, and Audit Requirements for
Federal Awards, 2 C.F.R. Part 200.
(b) (1) In order to improve efficiency, streamline and reduce redundant
processes, reduce paperwork and administrative burdens on both granting agencies and
grant recipients, and facilitate development and implementation of a statewide centralized
grants management and accountability system, the Council shall study and make
recommendations to the Department regarding the entire grants life cycle, including:
(iii) regulations adopting each part of the uniform guidance, with
appropriate modifications for its application to grant–making entities in the State,
including modifications or variances based on the scope or size of particular grant
programs, grant–making entities, or grantees;
(c) On or before July 1, 2027, the Council shall submit a report on its full
recommendations as required by subsection (b)(1) of this section to the Department and the
General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.

SENATE BILL 127
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and 9 months and, at the
end of June 30, 2028, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly,
shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has been
passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to each of
the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is enacted.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.